District of Columbia statutes.
46-507

Void marriage or domestic partnership.

If a marriage or domestic partnership is determined to be void, an agreement that would otherwise have been a premarital agreement is enforceable only to the extent necessary to avoid an inequitable result, unless the agreement expressly provides that it shall be enforceable in the event that the marriage or domestic partnership is later determined to be void.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-82, § 8, 42 DCR 6770
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 8(f), 53 DCR 1035
1981 Ed., § 30-147.
D.C. Law 16-79, in section heading, substituted “marriage or domestic partnership” for “marriage”; and substituted “marriage or domestic partnership” for “marriage”.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act.